California statutes. Public Resources Code
(3) A well listed as an orphan well pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 3206.3 or an idle-deserted well, as defined in Section 3251, is eligible to be converted
 for use as a gravity-based energy storage well if all applicable and necessary rights to do so have been obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 3190.9.)
-------------------------------------------

3190.1.

(a) The supervisor, after consulting with the State Water Resources Control Board and an appropriate regional water quality control board, may authorize the conversion of not more than 250 wells for use as gravity-based energy storage wells pursuant to this article to evaluate their use, including the establishment of appropriate operating conditions and physical parameters to
 safely store and generate energy.

(b) Before authorizing the use of a well as a gravity-based energy storage well, the supervisor, the State Water Resources Control Board, or an appropriate regional water quality control board may require the operator to provide additional information demonstrating the suitability of the well for use as a gravity-based energy storage well, including, but not limited to, providing an analysis of the chemical composition of the fluid in the wellbore, and may require testing for, among other indicators of suitability,
 total dissolved solids, total petroleum hydrocarbon as crude oil, major cations, including, but not limited to, calcium, magnesium, sodium, potassium, iron, manganese, strontium, and boron, major anions, including, but not limited to, chloride, sulfate, bicarbonate, carbonate, bromide, and iodide, total alkalinity and hydroxide, electrical conductance, potential of hydrogen or pH, and temperature. Liquid analysis required pursuant to this section shall be performed by a laboratory that is certified by the State Water Resources Control Board’s Environmental Laboratory Accreditation Program. The performing laboratory shall submit the data and analysis directly to the supervisor or the appropriate regional water quality control board, as appropriate, using a digital format, and also to the State Water Resources Control Board, in an electronic format uploaded to their online GeoTracker information system following the applicable regulations adopted pursuant to Section 13197.5 of the Water Code.

(c) The operator, before conversion of a well to a gravity-based energy storage well, shall file with the supervisor a written notice of intention to convert the well to a gravity-based energy storage well. The notice shall contain the pertinent data the supervisor requires in a format acceptable to the supervisor. The supervisor may require other pertinent information to supplement the notice. If conversion has not commenced within 24 months from the approval of the notice, the notice shall be deemed canceled. The notice shall not be extended and the cancellation shall be noted in the division’s records.

(d) The conversion of a well for use as a gravity-based energy storage well does not relieve the operator of its obligation to plug and abandon the well, decommission attendant facilities, and remediate the site, consistent with the requirements of this division.

(e) (1) Before authorizing the conversion of a well for use as a gravity-based energy storage well, the supervisor shall obtain an enforceable
 commitment from the operator that all contractors and subcontractors, at every tier, performing the conversion will pay at least prevailing wages and will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply if all work to perform the conversion is subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages and the use of a skilled and trained workforce.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, the following definitions apply:

(A) “Prevailing wages” means at the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the
 Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(B) “Project labor agreement” means a prehire collective bargaining agreement that establishes terms and conditions of employment for a specific construction project or projects and is an agreement described in Section 158(f) of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(C) “Skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 2601 of the Public Contract Code.

(f) Submittal of a written notice of intention or supplemental notice pursuant to this section is separate from, and in addition to, any requirement to submit a written notice of intention or supplemental notice pursuant to Section 3203.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 3190.9.)
-------------------------------------------

3190.2.

A well that has been permitted or operated as a Class II well, as defined in Section 3130, shall not be authorized for use as a gravity-based energy storage well without the written acknowledgment and authorization of the federal agency. The written acknowledgment and authorization shall be part of the well record.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 3190.9.)
-------------------------------------------

3190.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, “plan” means the plan required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 3206.

(b) An idle well that is authorized for use as a gravity-based energy storage well shall be identified in any plan or update to a
 plan. Identification of the idle well as a gravity-based energy storage well within the plan or update to the plan shall constitute the elimination of an idle well for purposes of compliance with plan requirements.

(c) A gravity-based energy storage well that ceases to be operated as a gravity-based energy storage well may be incorporated as an idle well in any plan or update to a plan and
 subject to the plan elimination requirements.

(d) An idle well that is authorized for use as a gravity-based energy storage well remains subject to the requirements of Section 3205.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 3190.9.)
-------------------------------------------

3190.4.

(a) The division shall require mechanical integrity testing before the conversion of a well to a gravity-based energy storage
 well, and not less than annually thereafter, that shall include, at a minimum, pressure testing. Test results and testing requirements shall be part of the well record. A gravity-based energy storage well that has lost mechanical integrity shall cease operation as a gravity-based energy storage well until mechanical integrity is restored. In the event of a loss of mechanical integrity or leak to the environment, the operator of a gravity-based energy storage well shall notify the division, the State Air
 Resources Board, the appropriate regional water quality control board, and any schools or community members living within 3,200 feet of the well of the loss of mechanical integrity or leak.

(b) A well, after being converted for use as a gravity-based energy storage well, shall be continuously monitored for leaks, including, but not limited to, methane leaks. The supervisor, in consultation with the State Air
 Resources Board and the State Water Resources Control Board, shall establish criteria for leak monitoring and reporting.

(c) The operator of a gravity-based energy storage well shall annually report data, including, but not limited to, the number of wells converted to gravity-based energy storage wells, the number of converted gravity-based energy storage wells that were previously leaking methane or other fluid, the average number of cycles to store and produce energy per day by gravity-based energy storage wells, and energy production from gravity-based energy storage wells, to the division.

(d) This section does not alter or affect the obligation of the operator to comply with Section
 8589.7 of the Government Code, as applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 3190.9.)
-------------------------------------------

3190.5.

A gravity-based energy storage well that has lost its mechanical integrity shall be plugged and abandoned within one year or scheduled for plugging and abandonment in an approved idle well management plan or related plan approved by the supervisor unless the mechanical integrity of the well is restored.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 3190.9.)
-------------------------------------------

3190.6.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, a gravity-based energy storage well shall meet all requirements applicable to a well specified in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 3190.9.)
-------------------------------------------

3190.7.

The division shall identify all wells converted to or being operated as gravity-based energy storage wells on its internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 3190.9.)
-------------------------------------------

3190.8.

(a) On or by January 1, 2033, the division, in consultation with entities operating gravity-based energy storage wells, the Secretary for Environmental Protection,
 the State Water Resources Control Board and regional water quality boards, the State Air Resources Board, the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, relevant local jurisdictions, environmental and environmental justice organizations, tribes, and other stakeholders, shall evaluate the Gravity-Based Energy Storage Well Pilot Program and make recommendations to the Legislature for a framework to implement an ongoing Gravity-Based Energy Storage Well Program to provide for regulation of the operation of gravity-based energy storage
 wells as a result of the benefits determined for renewable energy sources and the storage of the energy in gravity-based energy storage wells. The recommendations shall be informed by the Gravity-Based Energy Storage Well Pilot Program and shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Implications of conversion of a well to a gravity-based energy storage well for local land use authorization and applicability of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)), including designation of the appropriate lead agency.

(2) Appropriate regulatory parameters, including physical design, operating conditions, mechanical integrity, and inspection protocols, for
 gravity-based energy storage wells to ensure safe, leak-free operation, including, but not limited to, methane leaks and leakage to the environment, including into aquifers of beneficial use. This shall include whether the redrilling of a plugged and abandoned well may be allowed for a gravity-based energy storage well.

(3) Implications of conversion of a well to a gravity-based energy storage well for existing well classifications and associated requirements.

(4) Tracking and monitoring by the regulator of gravity-based energy
 storage wells to ensure that those wells are ultimately plugged and abandoned pursuant to Section 3208, attendant equipment and infrastructure is decommissioned, and the site remediated.

(b) The recommendations pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include
 a review of gravity-based energy storage well operations including any leaks to the environment and loss of mechanical integrity.

(c) In developing the recommendations pursuant to subdivision (a), there shall be at least one public meeting to solicit public input.

(d) The recommendations shall be submitted to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, pursuant to Section 3190.9.)
-------------------------------------------

3190.9.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), this article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2035, and as of that date is repealed.

(b) The authorization issued pursuant to Section 3474.2 shall terminate upon the repeal of this article.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), in the absence of another program authorizing the use of gravity-based energy storage wells, idle wells that are
 authorized to be used as gravity-based energy storage wells under this article shall be reclassified, upon the repeal of this article, as idle wells subject to Section 3206 and other applicable law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 419, Sec. 1.   (SB 567)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2035, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 3.6, commencing with Section 3190.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Regulation of Operations [3200. - 3238.]

3200.

An owner or operator of a well or production facility shall designate an agent, giving his or her address, who resides in this state, to receive and accept service of all orders, notices, and processes of the supervisor or a court of law. Every person so appointing an agent shall, within five days after the termination of the agency, notify the supervisor, in writing, of the termination, and unless operations are discontinued, shall appoint a new agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 562, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

3201.

(a) The operator of a well or production facility shall notify the supervisor or the district deputy, in writing, in the form that the supervisor or the district deputy may direct, of the sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition of the well or production facility by the operator of the well or production facility as soon as is reasonably possible, but in no event later than the date that the sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition becomes final. The operator shall not be relieved of responsibility for the well or production facility until the supervisor or the district deputy acknowledges the sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition, in writing, and the person acquiring the well or production facility is in compliance with Section 3202. The
 operator’s notice shall contain all of the following information:

(1) The name and address of the person to whom the well or production facility was or will be sold, assigned, transferred, conveyed, exchanged, or otherwise disposed.

(2) The name and location of the well or production facility, and a description of the land upon which the well or production facility is situated.

(3) The date that the sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition becomes final.

(4) The date when possession was or will be relinquished by the operator as a result of that disposition.

(b) (1) Upon request of the supervisor, the former operator shall, within 15
 days, provide to the division copies of the documents recorded with a governmental office involving the sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition of the well or production facility.

(2) If after reviewing the documents submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) the division determines additional documentation is needed to validate the sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition of the well or production facility, the division shall notify the former operator.

(3) Upon receiving notice pursuant to paragraph (2), the former operator shall, within 30 days, provide to the division documents necessary to identify the operator of the well or production facility. If the documents are not otherwise publicly available, the former operator may redact information from the documents before submitting them to the division if the division agrees
 the information is not relevant to identification of the current operator of the well or production facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 234.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

3202.

(a) A person who acquires the right to operate a well or production facility, whether by purchase, transfer, assignment, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition, shall, as soon as it is reasonably possible, but not later than the date when the acquisition of the well or production facility becomes final, notify the supervisor or the district deputy, in writing, of the person’s operation. The acquisition of a well or production facility shall not be recognized as complete by the supervisor or the district deputy until the new operator provides all of the following material:

(1) The name and address of the person from whom the well or production facility was acquired.

(2) The name and location of the well or production facility, and a description of the land upon which the well or production facility is situated.

(3) The date when the acquisition becomes final.

(4) The date when possession was or will be acquired.

(5) An indemnity bond for each well as required pursuant to Section 3204, 3205, or 3205.8, as applicable.

(b) (1) Upon request of the
 supervisor, the new operator shall, within 15 days, provide to the division copies of the documents recorded with a governmental office involving the sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition of the well or production facility.

(2) If after reviewing the documents submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) the division determines additional documentation is needed to validate the sale, assignment, transfer, conveyance, exchange, or other disposition of the well or production facility, the division shall notify the new operator.

(3) Upon receiving notice pursuant to paragraph (2), the new operator shall, within 30 days, provide to the division documents necessary to identify the operator of the well or production facility. If the documents are not otherwise
 publicly available, the new operator may redact information from the documents before submitting them to the division if the division agrees the information is not relevant to identification of the current operator of the well or production facility.

(c) After notice is given pursuant to subdivision (a) and until another person acquires the well or production facility, the new operator shall notify the supervisor whether any of the rights have changed. That notification shall be in writing and occur every other year by July 1.

(d) The new operator shall also notify the supervisor within 30 days of any quitclaim of a well or production facility.

(e) The supervisor shall maintain records of all transfers recognized
 as complete pursuant to subdivision (a), including all materials required to be provided by the new operator under that subdivision, and shall make those records available
 on the division’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 359, Sec. 3.   (AB 1167)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3203.

(a) The operator of any well, before commencing the work of drilling the well, shall file with the supervisor or the district deputy a written notice of intention to commence drilling. Drilling shall not commence until approval is given by the supervisor or the district deputy. If the supervisor or the district deputy fails to give the operator written response to the notice within 10 working days from the date of receipt, that failure shall be considered as an approval of the notice and the notice, for the purposes and intents of this chapter, shall be deemed a written report of the supervisor. If operations have not commenced within 24 months of receipt of the notice, the notice shall be deemed canceled, the
 notice shall not be extended, and the cancellation shall be noted in the division’s records. The notice shall contain the pertinent data the supervisor requires on printed forms supplied by the division or on other forms acceptable to the supervisor. The supervisor may require other pertinent information to supplement the notice.

(b) After the completion of any well, this section also applies as far as may be, to the deepening or redrilling of the well, any operation involving the plugging of the well, or any operations permanently altering in any manner the casing of the well. The number or designation of any well, and the number or designation specified for any well in a notice filed as required by this section, shall not be changed without first obtaining a written consent of the supervisor.

(c) If an operator has failed to comply with an order of the supervisor, the supervisor may deny approval of proposed well operations until the operator brings its existing well operations into compliance with the order. If an operator has failed to pay a civil penalty, remedy a violation that it is required to remedy to the satisfaction of the supervisor pursuant to an order issued under Section 3236.5, or to pay any charges assessed under Article 7 (commencing with Section 3400), the supervisor may deny approval to the operator’s proposed well operations until the operator pays the civil penalty, remedies the violation to the satisfaction of the supervisor, or pays the charges assessed under Article 7 (commencing with Section 3400).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 652, Sec. 1.   (SB 724)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

3203.5.

(a) The division shall require a copy of the local land use authorization that supports the installation of a well at the time an operator submits the notice of intention for the well under Section 3203.

(b) The division shall modify its forms used to evaluate notices of intention under Section 3203 to include expiration dates for the required local land use authorizations described in
 subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 727, Sec. 5.   (SB 406)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

3204.

(a) An operator who, on or after January 1, 2018, engages in the drilling, redrilling, deepening, or in any operation permanently altering the casing, of a well, shall file with the supervisor an individual indemnity bond for each well so drilled, redrilled, deepened, or permanently altered in the following amount:

(1) Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for each well that is less than 10,000 feet deep.

(2) Forty thousand dollars ($40,000) for each well that is 10,000 or more feet deep.

(b) The bond shall be filed with the supervisor at the time of the
 filing of the notice of intention to perform work on the well, as provided in Section 3203, or at the time of acquisition of the well, as provided in Section 3202. The bond shall be executed by the operator, as principal, and by an authorized surety company, as surety, on the condition that the principal named in the bond shall faithfully comply with all the provisions of this chapter, in drilling, redrilling, deepening, or permanently altering the casing in any well or wells covered by the bond, and shall secure the state against all losses, charges, and expenses incurred by it to obtain the compliance by the principal named in the bond.

(c) The conditions of the bond shall be stated in substantially the following language: “If the ____, the above bounden principal, shall well and truly comply with all the provisions of Division 3 (commencing
 with Section 3000) of the Public Resources Code and shall obey all lawful orders of the State Oil and Gas Supervisor or the district deputy or deputies, subject to subsequent appeal as provided in that division, and shall pay all charges, costs, and expenses incurred by the supervisor or the district deputy or deputies in respect of the well or wells or the property or properties of the principal, or assessed against the well or wells or the property or properties of the principal, in pursuance of the provisions of that division, then this obligation shall be void; otherwise, it shall remain in full force and effect.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 359, Sec. 4.   (AB 1167)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.

(a) An operator who engages in the drilling, redrilling, deepening, or in any operation permanently altering the casing, of 20 or more wells at any time, may file with the supervisor one blanket indemnity bond to cover all the operations in any of its wells in the state in lieu of an individual indemnity bond for each operation as required by Section 3204. The bond shall be executed by the operator, as principal, and by an authorized surety company, as surety, and shall be in substantially the same language and upon the same conditions as provided in Section 3204, except as to the difference in the amount. The bond shall be provided in one of the following amounts, as applicable:

(1) The sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000), for an operator having 50 or fewer wells in the state, exclusive of properly abandoned wells.

(2) The sum of four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000), for any operator having more than 50, but no more than 500, wells in the state, exclusive of properly abandoned wells.

(3) The sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000), for any operator having more than 500, but no more than 10,000, wells in the state, exclusive of properly abandoned wells.

(4) The sum of three million dollars ($3,000,000), for any operator having more than 10,000 wells in the state, exclusive of properly abandoned wells.

(b) This
 section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 272, Sec. 4.   (AB 2729)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative January 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.1.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 3204 and 3205, a person who engages in the drilling, redrilling, or deepening, or in any operation permanently altering the casing, of one or more wells located on submerged lands under ocean waters within the jurisdiction of this state, shall file with the supervisor a blanket indemnity bond for one million dollars ($1,000,000) to cover all his or her operations in drilling, redrilling, deepening, or permanently altering the casing in any of his or her wells located on those submerged lands. The bond shall be executed by the person, as principal, and by an authorized surety company, as surety, and the conditions of the bond shall be the same as the conditions stated in Section 3204, except for the difference in the
 amount.

(b) In addition to providing the bond required by subdivision (a), a person who operates one or more wells that are located on tide or submerged lands within the jurisdiction of this state shall provide an additional amount of security acceptable to the supervisor, covering the full costs of plugging and abandoning all of the operator’s wells. The supervisor shall determine the amount of the security required of each operator, based on his or her determination of the reasonable costs of that plugging and abandonment, after providing the operator with an opportunity to submit a cost estimate for consideration by the supervisor. The supervisor may not adjust the amount of security required of each operator more frequently than once every three years, to reflect changes in those costs. An operator may self-insure this
 security obligation if the supervisor, at his or her discretion, determines that the operator has sufficient financial resources to plug and abandon the wells for which the operator is responsible. The security shall remain in effect until all wells are plugged and abandoned in accordance with Section 3208, but the supervisor shall reduce the amount of the security required of an operator to reflect reduced obligations as wells are plugged and abandoned.

(c) If the state lease or other agreement that sets forth obligations or performance requirements under the lease provides security that is equal to, or greater than, the total of the additional security required pursuant to subdivision (b), plus all other liabilities under the lease or other agreement, the supervisor shall not require the additional security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 607, Sec. 2.   (SB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 3204, any person who engages in the operation of a class II commercial wastewater disposal well, as defined in subdivision (d), shall file an indemnity bond with the supervisor for one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each well so used. The bond shall cover all operations of drilling, redrilling, deepening, altering casing, maintaining, or abandoning the well and attendant facilities. The bond shall be executed by the person as the principal, and by an authorized surety company as the surety, and, except for differences in the amount, shall be in substantially the same language and upon the same conditions as provided in Section 3204.

(b) A blanket
 bond submitted under subdivision (a) of Section 3205 may be used in lieu of the bond required in subdivision (a), except that the termination and cancellation shall be in accordance with subdivision (c) of this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 3207, any bond issued in compliance with this section may be terminated and canceled and the surety relieved of all obligations thereunder when the well is properly abandoned or another valid bond has been substituted therefor.

(d) A class II commercial wastewater disposal well is a well that is used to dispose of oilfield wastewater for a fee and that is regulated by the division pursuant to this chapter and Subpart F (commencing with Section 147.250) of Part 147 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 315, Sec. 4.   (SB 665)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.3.

(a) The division may require an operator filing an individual indemnity bond pursuant to Section 3204 or a blanket indemnity bond pursuant to Section 3205, as applicable, to provide an additional amount of security acceptable to the division based on the division’s evaluation of the risk that the operator will desert its well or wells and the potential threats the operator’s well or wells pose to life, health, property, and natural resources. The additional security required by the division shall not exceed
 the lesser of the division’s estimation of the reasonable costs of properly plugging and abandoning all of the operator’s wells and decommissioning any attendant production facilities in accordance with Section 3208, or thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

 (b) When making an estimation under this section of the reasonable costs of properly
 plugging and abandoning an operator’s well or wells and decommissioning any attendant production facilities, the division shall provide the operator with an opportunity to submit the operator’s own estimation and shall consider all of the following:

(1) The depth of the well or wells.

(2) The accessibility and surroundings of the well or wells and any attendant production facilities.

(3) Available information about the condition of the well or wells and any attendant production facilities.

(4) Available information about the cost to plug and abandon a comparable well or wells.

(5) Available information about the cost to decommission production facilities comparable to the production facilities attendant to the well or wells.

(6) The operator’s cost estimates, if provided.

(7) Whether the operator is a public utility gas corporation, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 216 of the Public Utilities Code.

(8) Any other information that the division determines to be relevant to the estimation of cost.

(c) The
 division, in evaluating the risk that the operator will desert its well or wells and the potential threats the operator’s well or wells pose to life, health, property, and natural resources, shall consider all of the following:

(1) The difference between the estimation of reasonable costs of plugging and abandonment under
 subdivisions (a) and (b) and the total amount of indemnity bonds or other financial assurances in place to ensure funding of the plugging and abandonment of the operator’s well or wells.

(2) The level of current production from the well or wells.

(3) Available information regarding estimated reserves remaining in place associated with the well or wells.

(4) Whether the well or wells are “critical,” are “environmentally sensitive,” or are in an “urban area,” as those terms are defined by the division in regulation.

(5) To the
 extent that relevant information is available to the division, the financial status of the operator and the operator’s financial capacity to plug and abandon all of the operator’s wells.

(6) The past record of compliance by the operator with the division.

(7) The number of idle wells to be covered by the indemnity bond and the operator’s record of compliance with the requirements of Section 3206 and the division’s regulations related to the management of idle wells.

(8) Whether the operator’s well or wells are subject to any bonding or financial assurance requirements by a local government.

(9) Whether the operator’s well or wells are already subject to additional
 bond coverage by the division pursuant to Section 3270.4.

(10) Any other information that the division determines to be relevant to the evaluation of the risk.

(d) The division shall provide the operator with notice of the requirement to provide additional security, and the notice shall be served by personal service or certified mail. The operator shall provide the additional security within 180 days of service of notice. The notice shall include an explanation of the division’s estimation of the reasonable costs to plug and abandon the operator’s well or wells and of the basis for the decision to require the operator to provide additional security. The requirements of this subdivision shall also apply to any subsequent increase in the amount of additional security required
 under subdivision (e).

(e) The division shall increase or decrease the amount of additional security required under this section to account for changed circumstances or new information. The operator may, at any time, petition the division to reevaluate the division’s evaluation of the risk or cost estimates, and the division shall respond to the petition in writing within 60 days of receipt of the petition.

(f) (1) An operator shall provide additional security required under this section in the form of an indemnity bond, a form of deposit described in Section 995.710 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or any other equally effective means of financial assurance approved by
 the division. Examples of equally effective means of financial assurance that the division may consider for approval include a letter of credit, a corporate guarantee, a trust fund, or a demonstration of self-insurance.

(2) The division may only approve self-insurance as an equally effective means of financial assurance if the operator provides detailed financial information demonstrating to the division’s satisfaction that, based on the considerations under subdivision (c), the risks associated with the operator’s potential for desertion of its well or wells are low. If the division approves self-insurance as an equally effective means of financial assurance, at least once every five years the operator shall update the supporting financial information and
 the division shall reevaluate whether self-insurance continues to be an equally effective means of financial assurance. If an operator provides financial information to the division under this section that is not otherwise publicly available, the division shall maintain the information as confidential.

(g) (1) Any two or more operators may elect to enter into a liability sharing agreement.

(2) Operators that elect to participate in a liability sharing agreement shall be jointly and severally liable for all amounts owed under this chapter by all other operators that participate in the liability sharing agreement.

(3) The division shall treat all operators that participate in a liability sharing agreement as a single operator when requiring additional security under this section, except that the additional security required by the division shall not exceed the lesser of the division’s estimation of the reasonable costs of plugging and abandoning all of the participating operators’ wells and decommissioning any attendant production facilities in accordance with Section 3208, or thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

(4) A liability sharing agreement is formed when all of the participants have provided the division written notice of intent to participate in the liability sharing agreement with express acknowledgment of all other participants in the agreement.

(5) An operator may elect to withdraw from a liability sharing agreement at any time, but all participants in the liability sharing agreement, including the withdrawing participant, shall continue to be jointly and severally liable for all amounts owed under this chapter for a period of five years after the withdrawal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 771, Sec. 13.   (AB 1057)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.5.

In lieu of the indemnity bond required by Sections 3204, 3205, 3205.1, 3205.2, 3205.8, and 3206, a deposit may, with the written approval of the supervisor, be given pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 995.710) of Chapter 2 of Title 14 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure, other than a deposit of money or bearer bonds or bearer notes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 359, Sec. 5.   (AB 1167)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.6.

Before July 1, 2020, the supervisor shall do all of the following:

(a) Evaluate and estimate the costs associated with the decommissioning, including plugging and abandonment pursuant to Section 3208, of the offshore oil and gas wells under its jurisdiction.

(b) If necessary, based on the estimates made pursuant to subdivision (a), develop a schedule to increase the bond amounts or other financial surety provided by an operator of an offshore oil or gas well to ensure sufficient moneys are available to the state to decommission the well if no other entity is responsible for those decommissioning costs.

(c) Coordinate with the State Lands Commission to ensure the actions taken pursuant to this section and Section 6829.3 are not duplicative and are consistent with Section 3205.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 607, Sec. 3.   (SB 1147)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

3205.7.
